Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Administrative Dissolution.

§79-4-14.20.
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-4-14.21 to administratively dissolve a corporation if:

The corporation does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any franchise taxes or penalties imposed by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. or other law;

The corporation does not deliver its annual report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after it is due;

The corporation is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The corporation does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days that its registered agent has been changed, or that its registered agent has resigned;

The corporation’s period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation expires; or

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the corporation signed a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.20; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 36, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “or registered office” following “registered agent” in (3) and (4) deleted “or that its registered office has been discontinued” at the end of (4); added (6); and made minor stylistic changes.

Procedures for, and effect of, administrative dissolution, see § 79-4-14.21.

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-347 through 79-11-353.

Liability for corporate debt was limited to those officers and directors who were actively involved in the control and management of the corporation, and the president’s testimony at trial made it clear he was involved in the control and management of the corporation; however, where there was no proof of any assignment to the president by the corporation of any chose in action as contemplated under Miss. Code § 11-7-7, the president had no standing to pursue the action on behalf of the corporation. Consequently, although the president, individually, could have been held liable for the corporate torts committed by the corporation, he had no authority to sue on a contract that belonged to the corporation; accordingly, all claims brought by the corporation and the president were dismissed. 4 H Constr. Corp. v. Superior Boat Works, Inc., 659 F. Supp. 2d 774, 2009 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 83183 (N.D. Miss. 2009), aff'd, 579 Fed. Appx. 278, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 16558 (5th Cir. Miss. 2014).

The owner and operator of an incorporated sole proprietorship was personally liable, under former § 79-3-285, for corporate debts to a creditor who dealt with the corporation as a sole proprietorship which were incurred while the corporation was suspended from doing business, pursuant to former § 79-3-189, for failing to file an annual report. Carolina Transformer Co. v. Anderson, 341 So. 2d 1327, 1977 Miss. LEXIS 2303 (Miss. 1977).

What amounts to “oppressive” conduct under statute authorizing dissolution of corporation at suit of minority stockholders.
56 A.L.R.3d 358.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissension.
83 A.L.R.3d 458.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2391 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1647 et seq.

1984 Mississippi Supreme Court Review: Corporate, Contract and Commercial Law. 55 Miss. L. J. 65, March, 1985.

§79-4-14.21.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-4-14.20 for dissolving a corporation, he shall serve the corporation with written notice of his determination, except that such determination may be served by first-class mail.

If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation, except that such certificate may be served by first-class mail.

A corporation that has been administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except as necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under Section 79-4-14.05 and notify claimants under Sections 79-4-14.06 and 79-4-14.07.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation shall not impair the validity of any contract, deed, mortgage, security interest, lien, or act of the corporation or prevent the corporation from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state.

A corporation that has been administratively dissolved may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state until the corporation is reinstated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.21; Laws, 1991, ch. 509, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 37; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 36; Laws, 2017, ch. 369, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

Section 36 of Chapter 481 Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 37 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 36 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-14.22 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” preceding “except that such determination” in (a); in (b), deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” following “notice is perfected” in the first sentence, and deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” preceding “except that such certificate may be served” in the last sentence.

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” following “written notice of his determination” in (a); in (b), deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” following “notice is perfected” in the first sentence, and preceding “except that such certificate” in the last sentence; rewrote (c); and added (e) and (f).

The 2017 amendment added (c), which had previously been set out as reserved.

Authority for Secretary of State to commence proceeding under § 79-4-14.21 to administratively dissolve corporation, and grounds therefor, see § 79-4-14.20.

Rights of corporation administratively dissolved under § 79-4-14.21 to apply for reinstatement, and procedures therefor, see § 79-4-14.22.

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-347 through 79-11-353.

Pursuant to Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.21(c) the corporate existence of the corporation continued, but it was not authorized to carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs. Because the corporation failed to comply with the process under § 79-4-14.22(a) to reinstate the corporation, the court found that during the period relevant to the present litigation, the corporation was not a viable entity and thus did not have standing to enter into the contracts at issue; therefore, it followed that the corporation’s claims for breach of contract, misrepresentation, and quantum meruit were moot and had to be dismissed. 4 H Constr. Corp. v. Superior Boat Works, Inc., 659 F. Supp. 2d 774, 2009 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 83183 (N.D. Miss. 2009), aff'd, 579 Fed. Appx. 278, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 16558 (5th Cir. Miss. 2014).

When plaintiffs corporation and principal sued defendant supplier, the corporation was properly dismissed because it was administratively dissolved under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.21(b) (2013), so, under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.22(a)(4) (2013), it could not maintain its claim, it did not seek voluntary or judicial dissolution, so it could not maintain its suit to wind up its business, and it was not defending a suit. Wayne Johnson Elec. Inc. v. Robinson Elec. Supply Co., 266 So.3d 643, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 122 (Miss. 2019).

Dissolved corporation could not bring an action against a school district because it had administratively dissolved, pursuant this section; the action was not related to the winding down of the corporation, and it was initiated by a profit corporation, a status that the dissolved corporation did not enjoy. Columbus Cheer Co. v. City of Columbus, 155 So.3d 744, 2014 Miss. LEXIS 532 (Miss. 2014).

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2391 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1647 et seq.

§79-4-14.22.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A corporation administratively dissolved under Section 79-4-14.21 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The applicant must:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

State that the corporation’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-4-4.01; and

Contain a certificate from the Mississippi Department of Revenue reciting that all taxes owed by the corporation have been paid.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) and that the information is correct, he shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation.

When the reinstatement is effective:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution;

Any liability incurred by the corporation, director, officer or a shareholder after the administrative dissolution and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred; and

The corporation may resume carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.22; Laws, 1993, ch. 368, § 13; Laws, 2009, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 530, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 38; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 37, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 1 of ch. 527, Laws of 2009, effective from and after July 1, 2009 (approved April 13, 2009), amended this section. Section 3 of ch. 530, Laws of 2009, effective from and after July 1, 2009 (approved April 14, 2009), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 1 of ch. 527, Laws of 2009, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-14.22 as amended by chapter 530, Laws of 2009.

Section 37 of Chapter 481 Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 38 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 37 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-14.22 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The first 2009 amendment (ch. 527) substituted “at any time” for “within five (5) years” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (a).

The second 2009 amendment (ch. 530) substituted “at any time” for “within five (5) years” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (a).

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), substituted “Department of Revenue” for “State Tax Commission” in (a)(4); and deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” following “copy on the corporation” at the end of (b).

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, substituted “Department of Revenue” for “State Tax Commission” preceding “reciting that all taxes owed by the corporation” in (a)(4); and deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” following “copy on the corporation” at the end of (b); and rewrote (c).

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-347 through 79-11-353.

Pursuant to Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.21(c) the corporate existence of the corporation continued, but it was not authorized to carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs. Because the corporation failed to comply with the process under § 79-4-14.22(a) to reinstate the corporation, the court found that during the period relevant to the present litigation, the corporation was not a viable entity and thus did not have standing to enter into the contracts at issue; therefore, it followed that the corporation’s claims for breach of contract, misrepresentation, and quantum meruit were moot and had to be dismissed. 4 H Constr. Corp. v. Superior Boat Works, Inc., 659 F. Supp. 2d 774, 2009 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 83183 (N.D. Miss. 2009), aff'd, 579 Fed. Appx. 278, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 16558 (5th Cir. Miss. 2014).

When plaintiffs corporation and principal sued defendant supplier, the corporation was properly dismissed because it was administratively dissolved under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.21(b) (2013), so, under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-4-14.22(a)(4) (2013), it could not maintain its claim, it did not seek voluntary or judicial dissolution, so it could not maintain its suit to wind up its business, and it was not defending a suit. Wayne Johnson Elec. Inc. v. Robinson Elec. Supply Co., 266 So.3d 643, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 122 (Miss. 2019).

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2499 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1741.

§79-4-14.23.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, he shall serve the corporation with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located or where the corporation is domiciled within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s certificate of dissolution, the corporation’s application for reinstatement and the Secretary of State’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 14.23; Laws, 2009, ch. 527, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 39, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment inserted “or the chancery court of the county where the corporation is domiciled” in (b).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “under Section 79-4-5.04” following “shall serve the corporation” in (a); in (b), deleted “Mississippi” following “Hinds County” and inserted “corporation’s principal office is located or where the” preceding “corporation is domiciled within thirty (30) days” in the first sentence.

Administrative dissolution under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-347 through 79-11-353.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2499-2507.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 500, 501.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1741.